New Jersey, session 222, S3433.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission is authorized, consistent with federal law, to enter into a cooperative arrangement with a foreign country for the reciprocal recognition of driver licenses that authorize the operation of a non-commercial motor vehicle, provided that the: (1)   chief administrator and the foreign country have exchanged information allowing each jurisdiction to assess the other jurisdictions non-commercial motor vehicle driver licensing standards; (2)   chief administrator determines that the non-commercial motor vehicle driver licensing standards of the foreign country correspond substantially to those of this State; and (3)   foreign country extends the same privileges within the foreign country to those persons licensed by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission to operate a non-commercial motor vehicle within this State. b.    For the purposes of this section, non-commercial motor vehicle shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3 of P.L.1990, c.103 (C.39:3-10.11). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.